Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-222.02
Violations; report to Attorney General; suspension of authority to do business; appeal.

The Director of Insurance may, if he or she finds that any person or insurer has violated any of the provisions of sections 44-222 and 44-222.01, report the facts to the Attorney General for prosecution in accordance with the provisions of section 44-395. In lieu of the criminal prosecution provided herein or in addition thereto the Director of Insurance may suspend such insurer's authority to do business in Nebraska for such length of time as the director may prescribe. An appeal may be taken from the decision of the director, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1959, c. 197, § 3, p. 705;

Laws 1969, c. 359, § 9, p. 1271;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 41;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 70.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.